Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 2. Administration.

§ 60.2-108.
The Commission; appointment, term of office and compensation of Commissioner.

The Virginia Employment Commission shall consist of one Commissioner, who shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of four years, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, if in session when such appointment is made, and if not in session, then at its next succeeding session. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired terms. The Commissioner may be suspended or removed by the Governor at his pleasure, and he shall receive such compensation as may be provided in accordance with law.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-26; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-31; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-109.
Bond of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-27; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-32; 1986, c. 480; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The Commissioner shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, give bond payable to the Commonwealth, in a form approved by the Attorney General, in such penalty as shall be fixed by the Governor, with some surety or guaranty company duly authorized to do business in this Commonwealth. The bond shall be approved by the Governor as security and conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties. The premium of such bond shall be paid by the Commission, and the bond shall be filed with and preserved by the Comptroller.”

§ 60.2-110.
State Job Service and Unemployment Insurance Services Division.

The Commission may establish two coordinate divisions: the Virginia State Job Service, created pursuant to §

60.2-400

, and the Unemployment Insurance Services Division. Each division shall be responsible for the discharge of its distinctive functions. Each division shall be a separate administrative unit, with respect to personnel, budget, and duties, except insofar as the Commission may find that such separation is impracticable. In lieu, however, of establishing the two divisions the Commission may cooperate with and utilize the personnel and services of employment offices or services operated by the United States or any of its authorized agencies but only to the extent necessary for the federal employment offices or services to perform the functions imposed upon employment offices by §

60.2-601

and subdivision A 5 of §

60.2-612

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-28; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-33; 1986, c. 480; 2022, c. 668.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 668, inserted “A” following “subdivision” in the last sentence.

§ 60.2-111.
Duties and powers of Commission; reporting requirements.

It shall be the duty of the Commission to administer this title. It shall have power and authority to adopt, amend, or rescind such rules and regulations, to employ such persons, make such expenditures, require such reports, make such investigations, and take such other action, including the appointment of advisory groups, as it deems necessary or suitable to that end. Such rules and regulations shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2, except as to the subject matter of subdivisions 2 and 3 of §

60.2-515

, which shall become effective in the manner prescribed by §

2.2-4103

. The Commission shall determine its own organization and methods of procedure in accordance with provisions of this title, and shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

The Commission shall prepare an annual balance sheet of the moneys in the fund and in the Unemployment Trust Fund to the credit of the Commonwealth in which there shall be provided, if possible, a reserve against the liability in future years to pay benefits in excess of the then-current taxes. That reserve shall be set up by the Commission in accordance with accepted actuarial principles on the basis of statistics of employment, business activity, and other relevant factors for the longest possible period. Whenever the Commission believes that a change in tax or benefit rates is necessary to protect the solvency of the Fund, it shall promptly so inform the Governor and the General Assembly and make recommendations with respect thereto.

In preparing the annual balance sheet required by subsection B, the Commission shall regularly track metrics related to unemployment insurance benefits, establish a mechanism to help assess the adequacy of benefits, and examine metrics related to recipiency, average benefit levels, and benefit income replacement ratios. The annual balance sheet shall include the following calculations: (i) the average unemployment insurance benefit levels, (ii) the average income replacement of unemployment insurance benefits, and (iii) the recipiency rate for unemployment insurance benefits in the Commonwealth.

The Commission, as part of its biennial strategic plan submitted to the Department of Planning and Budget, shall develop and maintain a comprehensive unemployment insurance Resiliency Plan that describes specific actions the Commission will take, depending on the level of increase in unemployment insurance (UI) claims, to address staffing, communications, and other relevant aspects of operations to ensure continued efficient and effective administration of the UI program. The Resiliency Plan shall include proposed actions consistent with the following objectives to effectively prepare for periods of high unemployment:

Develop specific strategies or steps the Commission will take to modify staffing levels in response to incidents that increase UI program demand. These strategies or steps shall (i) include a staffing plan for varying levels of UI workload volume, (ii) cover several scenarios that may affect UI assistance services, (iii) explain how existing staff would be reallocated to high-priority functions in response to high demand, and (iv) describe how the Commission’s hiring process will be streamlined to fill key vacant positions such as adjudication and appeals staff.

Develop specific strategies or steps the Commission will take to modify policies, procedures, or processes in response to high demands on its services.

Outline a strategy for clearly communicating key UI program changes to customers. This strategy shall indicate which staff will be responsible for different types of communications and include several communications goals, such as clearly conveying UI program and policy changes.

Outline a strategy for clearly communicating important UI information to Commission staff, the public, and the General Assembly.

Formalize a policy for prioritizing and assigning claims for adjudication during periods of high claims volume. This policy shall detail how prioritization may change in response to claims volume and state that the policy of the Commission is to generally prioritize resolving older claims before newer claims.

Identify other tactical actions to be taken to ensure the continuity of UI claims processing and customer service.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-29; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-34; 1977, c. 445; 1984, c. 734; 1986, c. 480; 2022, cc. 716, 754.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 344, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Taxation (Department) and the Virginia Employment Commission (Commission) shall consider the feasibility of permitting taxpayers to submit tax reports and payments electronically for both the Virginia Employment Commission and the Department of Taxation using a single sign-on. The Department and the Commission shall also consider the feasibility, merits, and costs of developing and implementing an identity management system or retaining a contractor to do so.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 716 and 754, effective April 27, 2022, are identical, and substituted “then-current taxes” for “then current taxes” in the first sentence of subsection B; and added subsections C and D.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Private cause of action prohibited. —

Former police officer was not entitled to seek relief from his indefinite suspension in a private action, as subsection C of §

40.1-51.4:4

did not provide for such an action by the officer, and it was the duty of the Commissioner to administer the Virginia Unemployment Compensation Act, §

60.2-111

, for any violation of §

60.2-114

. Serrano v. City of Norfolk, 64 Va. Cir. 282, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 181 (Norfolk Mar. 29, 2004).

§ 60.2-112.
Repealed by Acts 1999, cc. 840 and 855.

§ 60.2-113.
Employment stabilization.

The Commission shall take all necessary steps through its appropriate divisions and with the advice of such advisory boards and committees as it may have to:

Establish a viable labor exchange system to promote maximum employment for the Commonwealth of Virginia with priority given to those workers drawing unemployment benefits;

Provide Virginia State Job Service services, as described in this title, according to the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49f), as amended by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act;

Maintain a solvent trust fund financed through equitable employer taxes that provide temporary partial income replacement to involuntarily unemployed covered workers;

Coordinate and conduct labor market information research studies, programs and operations, including the development, storage, retrieval and dissemination of information on the social and economic aspects of the Commonwealth and publish data needed by employers, economic development, education and training entities, government and other users in the public and private sectors;

Encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational guidance, training and retraining; and

Establish the Interagency Migrant Worker Policy Committee, comprised of representatives from appropriate state agencies, including the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, whose services and jurisdictions involve migrant and seasonal farmworkers and their employees. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall be required to cooperate with the Committee upon request.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-34; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-39; 1986, c. 480; 1989, c. 108; 1999, c. 357; 2004, cc. 14, 154, 592; 2008, cc. 98, 222; 2011, cc. 594, 681; 2014, c. 815; 2015, cc. 275, 292; 2017, c. 20; 2018, c. 225.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 225, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Employment Commission shall submit a plan to the Virginia Board of Workforce Development and the Governor’s Chief Workforce Advisor describing a process and timeline for developing and implementing a statewide workforce dashboard fed by an automated data pipeline by August 1, 2018. Full implementation of the plan shall begin no later than November 1, 2018.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 14 deleted “the Governor’s Employment and Training Department” preceding “the Department of Education” in the last sentence of subdivision 4 and substituted “long-range” for “long range” in subdivision 5.

The 2004 amendment by c. 154 deleted “the Governor’s Employment and Training Department” preceding “the Department of Education” in the last sentence of subdivision 4; deleted former subdivision 7, which read: “Develop a plan for implementation during times of economic recession, natural disaster or military mobilization whereby necessary workers can be provided”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 592 added subdivision 7 and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 98 and 222 are identical, and inserted present subdivision 2 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted the former second sentence in subdivision 8, which read: “The Committee shall coordinate its activities with the Migrant and Seasonal Farmworkers Board established in §

2.2-2407

.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 815 substituted “Virginia Board of Workforce Development” for “Virginia Workforce Council” in subdivision 5.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 275 and 292 are identical, and substituted “Innovation and Opportunity Act” for “Investment Act” in subdivision 2.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 20 deleted former subdivision 6 which read: “Prepare official short and long-range population projections for the Commonwealth for use by the General Assembly and state agencies with programs which involve or necessitate population projections” and redesignated subsequent subdivisions accordingly.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 225 deleted former subdivision 5, which read “Determine and publish a list of jobs, trades, and professions for which a high demand of qualified workers exists or is projected by the Commission. The Commission shall consult with the Virginia Board of Workforce Development in making such determination. Such information shall be published biennially and disseminated to employers; education and training entities, including public two-year and four-year institutions of higher education; government agencies, including the Department of Education and public libraries; and other users in the public and private sectors”; and made related changes.

§ 60.2-113.1.
Veterans Skills Database.

The Commission, in cooperation with the Secretary of Commerce and Trade and the Department of Veterans Services, shall establish the Veterans Skills Database (the database), an Internet-accessible database of veterans and their workforce skills, for the purpose of marketing and promoting the workforce skills of veterans to potential employers.

The Commission may contract with one or more third parties to develop, implement, and maintain the database. The database provider shall (i) maintain the database and (ii) take all actions to ensure the protection of the confidentiality and security of the information contained in the database in accordance with the requirements established by the Commission.

The following provisions shall apply to the database:

Any veteran may register to create a free profile on the database and supply information relating to his workforce skills and experience.

Potential employers may register to create a free profile and access the database to identify potential employees with relevant workforce skills and experience.

History.

2010, c. 277.

§ 60.2-114.
Records and reports.

Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work records, containing such information as the Commission may prescribe. Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied by the Commission or its authorized representatives at any reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The Commission may require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports, with respect to persons employed by it, which the Commission deems necessary for the effective administration of this title. Information thus obtained shall not be published or be open to public inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of their public duties, in any manner revealing the employing unit’s identity, except as the Commissioner or his delegates deem appropriate, nor shall such information be used in any judicial or administrative proceeding other than one arising out of the provisions of this title; however, the Commission shall make its records about a claimant available to the Workers’ Compensation Commission if it requests such records. However, any claimant at a hearing before an appeal tribunal or the Commission shall be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his claim. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the Commissioner, or his delegate, may, in his discretion, reveal information when such communication is not inconsistent with the proper administration of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Commission shall, on a reimbursable basis, furnish wage and unemployment compensation information contained in its records to the Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Division of Child Support Enforcement of the Department of Social Services for their use as necessary for the purposes of the National Directory of New Hires established under § 453(i) of the Social Security Act.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Commission shall, upon written request, furnish:

Any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or its designated agent, such information as it may require for the purpose of collecting fines, penalties, and costs owed to the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions. Such information shall not be published or used in any administrative or judicial proceeding, except in matters arising out of the collection of fines, penalties, and costs owed to the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions; and

The Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority such information as it may require to facilitate the administration and enforcement by the Authority of performance agreements with businesses that have received incentive awards. Any information provided to the Authority under this subdivision shall be confidential pursuant to 20 C.F.R. Part 603 and shall only be disclosed to members of the Authority who are public officials or employees of the Authority for the performance of their official duties. No public official or employee shall redisclose any confidential information obtained pursuant to this subdivision to nonlegislative citizen members of the Authority or to the public. Any information so provided shall be used by the Authority solely for the purpose of verifying employment and wage claims of those businesses that have received incentive awards.

Each employing unit shall report to the Virginia New Hire Reporting Center the employment of any newly hired employee in compliance with §

63.2-1946

.

Any member or employee of the Commission and any member, employee, or agent of any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-35; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-40; 1972, c. 764; 1986, c. 480; 1988, c. 766; 1993, cc. 246, 806; 1996, c. 220; 1997, c. 385; 1998, cc. 91, 108, 745; 2003, c. 721; 2013, c. 329; 2017, cc. 804, 824.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

For “the National Directory of New Hires established under § 453(i) of the Social Security Act,” referred to above, see 42 USCS § 653(i).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 721 inserted “or its designated agent” following “of the Commonwealth” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 329 substituted “report to the Virginia New Hire Reporting Center the employment of any newly hired employee” for “report only to the Virginia New Hire Reporting Center the initial employment of any person as defined in §

60.2-212

” in subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by cc. 804 and 824, effective April 5, 2017, are identical, and inserted the subdivision C 1 designation and added subdivision C 2; and made a minor stylistic change.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 11-1112 Report to Determine Liability for State Unemployment Tax.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Polygraph results prohibited in a proceeding. —

City’s demurrer to a former police officer’s suit to rescind a certificate of indefinite suspension was granted as polygraph results could be submitted before an administrative panel hearing under §

60.2-114

. Serrano v. City of Norfolk, 64 Va. Cir. 282, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 181 (Norfolk Mar. 29, 2004).

Private cause of action barred. —

Former police officer was not entitled to seek relief from his indefinite suspension in a private action, as subsection C of §

40.1-51.4:4

did not provide for such an action by the officer, and it was the duty of the Commissioner to administer the Virginia Unemployment Compensation Act, §

60.2-111

, for any violation of §

60.2-114

. Serrano v. City of Norfolk, 64 Va. Cir. 282, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 181 (Norfolk Mar. 29, 2004).

§ 60.2-114.01.
Furnishing information to consumer reporting agencies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of §

60.2-114

, the Commission shall be authorized to enter into agreements with any consumer reporting agency pursuant to which the consumer reporting agency is provided secure electronic access to information contained in quarterly wage reports submitted to the Commission by employing units, as set forth in this section.

The Commission shall:

Establish minimum audit, security, net worth, and liability insurance standards, technological requirements, and any other terms and conditions deemed necessary in the discretion of the Commission to safeguard the confidentiality of the information and to otherwise serve the public interest;

Require a contracting consumer reporting agency to pay all costs associated with the establishment or maintenance of the access to information provided for by this section, including but not limited to the costs of any audits of the consumer reporting agency or users by the Commission;

Be authorized to cancel any contract authorized by this section if the consumer reporting agency fails to comply with any requirement of this section or of the contract;

Be authorized to provide to a consumer reporting agency only information regarding the amount of wages for an individual reported by each employing unit, with the employing unit’s name and address, as may be further specified in the terms of the contract; and

Deposit any fees received by the Commission from a consumer reporting agency pursuant to this section into the state treasury for credit to the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund pursuant to §

60.2-314

.

The consumer reporting agency shall:

Require that any user of the information shall, prior to obtaining the wage report information, obtain a written consent from the individual to whom that wage report information pertains. The written consent shall prominently contain language specifying the following:

The individual’s consent to the Commission’s disclosure of the wage report information is voluntary, and the individual’s refusal to consent to the disclosure of wage information shall not be the basis for the denial of credit;

If the consent is granted, the information shall be released to specified parties;

Authorization by the individual is necessary for the release of wage and employment history information;

The specific application or transaction that constitutes the sole purpose for which the release is made;

That Commission files containing wage and employment history information submitted by employers may be accessed; and

The identity and address of parties authorized to receive the released information.

In addition to any limitation on the use or release of the wage reporting information set forth in this section, release and use of the information shall be subject to the privacy laws of the Commonwealth and the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act.

Except in cases of willful and malicious misconduct, the Commission and its employees shall be immune from any liability in connection with information provided under this section, including but not limited to liability with regard to the accuracy or use of the information.

An annual audit of a contracted consumer reporting agency shall be conducted by an independent certified public accountant to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section, and such audit shall be reviewed by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

For the purposes of this section, “consumer reporting agency” has the meaning assigned by § 603(f) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(f).

2.

Require the use of the information only for purposes permitted under § 604 of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681b; and

3.

Require that the information released shall be used only to verify the accuracy of the wage or employment information previously provided by an individual in connection with a specific transaction, to satisfy the user’s standard underwriting requirements or those imposed upon the user, and to satisfy the user’s obligations under applicable state or federal fair credit reporting laws.

History.

2005, c. 944.

Effective date.

This section became effective January 1, 2007.

§ 60.2-114.1.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 457, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

60.2-114.1

, pertaining to notification of withholding order, derived from Acts 1993, c. 165.

§ 60.2-115.
State-federal cooperation.

In the administration of this title, the Commission shall cooperate with the United States Department of Labor to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions of this title. The Commission shall make such reports, in such form and containing such information as the United States Department of Labor may require, and shall comply with such provisions as the United States Department of Labor may find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports. The Commission shall take such action, through the adoption of appropriate rules, regulations, administrative methods and standards, as may be necessary to secure to this Commonwealth and its citizens all advantages available under the provisions of the Social Security Act that relate to unemployment compensation, the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.), and the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act (See notes following 26 U.S.C. § 3304).

In the administration of the provisions in §§

60.2-610

and

60.2-611

, which are enacted to conform with the requirements of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act (See notes following 26 U.S.C. § 3304), the Commission shall take such action as may be necessary (i) to ensure that the provisions are so interpreted and applied as to meet the requirements of such federal act as interpreted by the United States Department of Labor, and (ii) to secure to this Commonwealth the full reimbursement of the federal share of extended benefits paid under this title that are reimbursable under the federal act.

The Commission shall further make its records available to the Railroad Retirement Board and shall furnish to the Railroad Retirement Board at the expense of the Railroad Retirement Board, such copies thereof as the Board shall deem necessary for its purposes in accordance with the provisions of § 303 (c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 503 (c)).

The Commission shall afford reasonable cooperation with every agency of the United States charged with the administration of any unemployment insurance law.

Upon request therefor, the Commission shall furnish to any agency of the United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment, the name, address, ordinary occupation, and employment status of each recipient of benefits and such recipient’s rights to further benefits under this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-39; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-44; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-116.
Reciprocal agreements.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Commission is hereby authorized to enter into arrangements with the appropriate agencies of other states or the federal government whereby individuals performing services in this and other states for a single employing unit under circumstances not specifically provided for in §§

60.2-212

through

60.2-219

, or under similar provisions in the unemployment compensation laws of such other states, shall be deemed to be engaged in employment performed entirely within this Commonwealth or within one of such other states. Such arrangements may set forth terms whereby the potential right to benefits accumulated under the unemployment compensation laws of one or more states or under such a law of the federal government, or both, may constitute the basis for the payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency of any state under terms which the Commission finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests and will not result in any substantial loss to the fund.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Commission is also authorized to enter into arrangements with the appropriate agencies of other states or of the federal government:

Whereby wages or services, upon the basis of which an individual may become entitled to benefits under the unemployment compensation law of another state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be wages for employment by employers for the purposes of §§

60.2-602

,

60.2-606

,

60.2-607

,

60.2-609

,

60.2-610

,

60.2-611

, subdivision A 1 of §

60.2-612

and §§

60.2-614

through

60.2-617

, provided such other state agency or agency of the federal government has agreed to reimburse the fund for such portion of benefits paid under this title upon the basis of such wages or services as the Commission finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests; and

Whereby the Commission will reimburse other state or federal agencies charged with the administration of unemployment compensation laws with such reasonable portion of benefits, paid under the law of any such other states or of the federal government upon the basis of employment or wages for employment by employers, as the Commission finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Commission is also authorized to enter into arrangements with the appropriate agencies of other states or of the federal government:

Whereby the Commission may deduct, in accordance with the provisions of §

60.2-633

, from unemployment benefits otherwise payable to an individual an amount equal to any overpayment made to such individual under an unemployment benefit program of the United States or of any other state, and not previously recovered. The amount so deducted shall be paid to the jurisdiction under whose program such overpayment was made and in accordance with the arrangement between the Commission and the jurisdiction.

Whereby the United States agrees to allow the Commission to recover from unemployment benefits otherwise payable to an individual under an unemployment benefit program of the United States any overpayments made by the Commission to such individual under this title and not previously recovered, in accordance with the same procedures that apply under subdivision 1 of this subsection.

The amendments made by this subsection shall apply to recoveries made on or after July 1, 1987, and shall apply with respect to overpayments made before, on, or after such date.

2.

Reimbursements so payable under subdivision 1 b of this subsection shall be deemed to be benefits for the purposes of §§

60.2-300

through

60.2-304

, but no reimbursement so payable shall be charged against any employer’s account for the purposes of §§

60.2-526

through

60.2-531

. The Commission is hereby authorized to make to other state or federal agencies and receive from such other state or federal agencies, reimbursements from or to the fund, in accordance with arrangements pursuant to this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-40; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-45; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 113; 2022, c. 668.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 668, inserted “A” following “subdivision” in subdivision B 1 a.

§ 60.2-117.
Use of collections in financing administrative expenditures.

If § 303 (a) (5) of Title III of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 503 (a) (5)) and § 3304 (a) (4) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.) are amended to permit a state agency to use, in partial or complete substitution for grants under such Title III, for financing administrative expenditures incurred in carrying out its employment security functions, some part of the moneys collected or to be collected under the state unemployment compensation law, this title shall, by Commission proclamation and rules to be issued with the Governor’s approval, be modified in the manner and to the extent and within the limits necessary to permit such use by the Commission under this title. Such modifications shall become effective on the same date as such use becomes permissible under such federal amendments.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-64; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-76; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-118.
Civil action to enforce title; actions on behalf of other states.

In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this title the Commission and the Commonwealth may be represented by the Office of the Attorney General.

The Office of the Attorney General may commence actions in this Commonwealth as agent for, or on behalf of, any other state:

To enforce judgments and liability for unemployment insurance taxes due such other state; or

To collect unemployment benefit overpayments of such state if such state extends like comity to this Commonwealth.

Venue for such actions shall be the same as for actions to enforce the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-109; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-126; 1972, c. 764; 1977, c. 445; 1986, c. 480.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 4 Venue. § 4.02 Preferred Venue. Bryson.

§ 60.2-119.
Criminal cases.

All criminal actions for violation of any provision of this title, or of any rules or regulations issued pursuant to this title, shall be prosecuted by the attorney for the Commonwealth of the county or city in which the offense, or a part thereof, was committed, except that the offense set out in §

60.2-518

or

60.2-632

shall be deemed to be committed and venue for the prosecution shall lie in the county or city wherein the statement, representation, or nondisclosure is received by the Commission. However, if a defendant resides in this Commonwealth and the courthouse of the county or city in which he resides is more than 100 miles from the City of Richmond, venue for such prosecution shall lie in the city or county where he resides, and the offense shall be prosecuted by the attorney for the Commonwealth for the city or county where the defendant resides. If, in the opinion of the Commission, the prosecution should be conducted by the Office of the Attorney General, that office, upon the request of the Commission, shall have authority to conduct or supervise such prosecution.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-110; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-127; 1972, c. 764; 1980, c. 674; 1986, c. 480; 2005, c. 105.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by c. 105 substituted “§

60.2-518

or

60.2-632

” for “§

60.2-632

or §

60.2-518

” in the first sentence and deleted “as determined in § 30-19.17” following “Richmond” in the second sentence.

§ 60.2-120.
Reimbursement of expenses of Office of Attorney General.

The compensation of the assistant attorneys general, together with their proper expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, shall be chargeable as administrative expense of the Commission and paid in the manner in which the compensation and expenses of employees of the Commission are paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-111; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-128; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-121.
Violation of title or rule or regulation.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this title or any valid rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to it, for which a penalty is not provided, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each day that such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-114; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-131; 1986, c. 480.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 60.2-121.1.
Communications with parties.

In any action commenced under this title, the Commission may, if the party elects, send notices and other communications to such party through email or other electronic means. The Commission shall allow any party to change its election regarding receiving communications through electronic means. If an electronic notice is not successfully transmitted through electronic means, the Commission shall send a new notice by first-class mail to the party’s alternative address on record.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 290.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 290, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Employment Commission (Commission) shall report to the Commission on Unemployment Compensation and the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor (i) the number of unemployment insurance claimants who elect to receive their communications by email or other electronic means pursuant to §

60.2-121.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and (ii) how such use of electronic communications impacts the Commission’s operations no later than December 31, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 60.2-121.2.
Electronic submission of information; payments.

Each employer subject to the provisions of this title shall submit claim-related forms, including separation information, using an electronic format as prescribed by the Commission, unless the employer has been granted a waiver by the Commission. An employer shall submit any other information related to a claim, as defined in §

60.2-528.1

, at any time when requested by the Commission, to the Commission by electronic means, unless the employer has been granted a waiver by the Commission. The Commission may also require, at any time, that an employer submit unemployment insurance tax payments electronically, unless the employer has been granted a waiver by the Commission.

The Commission may grant a waiver to an employer from providing information or payments electronically pursuant to this section at any time. The Commission may grant a waiver only if the Commission finds that the electronic submission requirement creates an unreasonable burden on the employer. All requests for a waiver shall be submitted in writing.

History.

2022, cc. 716, 754.